Florida, session 2026, SB814.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 27 28 Section 1.âSection 784.072, Florida Statutes, is created to 29 read: 30 784.072âNotification of imminent threat to schools and 31 child care facilities or the public; Ya Ya Alert; Imminent 32 Threat Alert.â 33 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 34 (a)ââChild care facilityâ has the same meaning as in s. 35 402.302. 36 (b)ââImminent Threat Alertâ means a notification issued 37 pursuant to subsection (3) which informs the public that an 38 imminent threat exists such that the lives and safety of people 39 are endangered, including, but not limited to, instances in 40 which a person suspected of killing or causing serious bodily 41 injury to another person or assaulting another person with a 42 deadly weapon has fled the scene of the offense. 43 (c)ââPrivate schoolâ has the same meaning as in s. 1002.01. 44 (d)ââYa Ya Alertâ means a notification issued pursuant to 45 subsection (2) which informs public schools, private schools, 46 and child care facilities that an imminent threat exists, 47 including, but not limited to, instances in which a person 48 suspected of killing or causing serious bodily injury to another 49 person or assaulting another person with a deadly weapon has 50 fled the scene of the offense, and which advises the schools and 51 facilities to lock their doors and encourages persons in those 52 schools and facilities to remain in lockdown and be vigilant in 53 watching for and reporting any suspicious activity. 54 (2)(a)âIf a local law enforcement agency that has 55 jurisdiction over the scene of an incident determines that the 56 scene gives rise to an imminent threat to the public, the agency 57 must activate the emergency alert system and issue a Ya Ya Alert 58 to all public and private schools and child care facilities 59 within a 3-mile radius of the incident location and may activate 60 the system and issue the alert to any other public or private 61 school or child care facility the agency determines is at risk, 62 given its proximity to the incident, including an incident in 63 which all of the following conditions are satisfied: 64 1.âA person has been killed or has suffered serious bodily 65 injury, or a person has been assaulted with a deadly weapon by 66 another person. 67 2.âThe person suspected of committing the offense has fled 68 the scene of the offense. 69 3.âThe law enforcement agency investigating the offense has 70 determined that the suspect poses an imminent threat to the 71 public safety. 72 (b)âFor purposes of complying with this subsection, each 73 local law enforcement agency shall create and maintain a list of 74 all public schools, private schools, and child care facilities 75 within its jurisdiction. 76 (c)âA public or private school or child care facility may 77 contact local law enforcement agencies to verify that it is 78 included on the list of those that will receive a Ya Ya Alert or 79 to register to be included on the list. A local law enforcement 80 agency must take a private school or child care facility off the 81 list if the school or facility requests that it be taken off the 82 list. 83 (d)1.âUpon recording, reporting, transmitting, displaying, 84 or releasing information pertaining to a Ya Ya Alert, the local 85 law enforcement agency with jurisdiction; the Department of Law 86 Enforcement; any state or local law enforcement agency and the 87 personnel of such agency; any radio or television network, 88 broadcaster, or other media representative; any dealer of 89 communications services as those terms are defined in s. 202.11; 90 or any other agency, employee, individual, or entity is immune 91 from civil liability for damages for complying in good faith 92 with this subsection and is presumed to have acted in good faith 93 in recording, reporting, transmitting, displaying, or releasing 94 information pertaining to the Ya Ya Alert. The presumption of 95 good faith is not overcome if a technical or clerical error is 96 made by any agency, employee, individual, or entity acting at 97 the request of the local law enforcement agency having 98 jurisdiction, or if information pertaining to a Ya Ya Alert is 99 incomplete or incorrect because the information received from 100 the local law enforcement agency was incomplete or incorrect. 101 2.âThis subsection may not be construed to create a duty of 102 the agency, employee, individual, or entity to record, report, 103 transmit, display, or release the Ya Ya Alert information 104 received from the local law enforcement agency having 105 jurisdiction. The decision to record, report, transmit, display, 106 or release information is discretionary with the agency, 107 employee, individual, or entity receiving the information. 108 (3)âAt the request of a local law enforcement agency, the 109 Department of Law Enforcement, in cooperation with the 110 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles and the 111 Department of Transportation, must activate the emergency alert 112 system and issue an Imminent Threat Alert to the public when the 113 local law enforcement agency confirms that an imminent threat to 114 the public exists, including, but not limited to, circumstances 115 in which all of the following conditions have been satisfied: 116 (a)âA person has been killed or has suffered serious bodily 117 injury, or a person has been assaulted with a deadly weapon by 118 another person. 119 (b)âThe person suspected of committing the offense has fled 120 the scene of the offense. 121 (c)âThe law enforcement agency has determined that the 122 suspect poses an imminent threat to the public safety. 123 (4)âAn Imminent Threat Alert must, to the extent 124 practicable, provide a detailed description of a suspectâs 125 vehicle or other means of escape, the license plate number of 126 the suspectâs vehicle, or any other available information that 127 may assist in averting further harm or in apprehending the 128 suspect. 129 (5)(a)âAn Imminent Threat Alert must be immediately 130 disseminated to the public through the emergency alert system 131 and through the use of dynamic message signs located along the 132 State Highway System. 133 (b)âIf a traffic emergency arises which requires 134 information pertaining to the traffic emergency to be displayed 135 on a dynamic message sign on a state highway in lieu of an 136 Imminent Threat Alert, the agency responsible for posting the 137 Imminent Threat Alert on the dynamic message sign does not 138 violate this section. 139 (c)1.âUpon receiving a request to record, report, transmit, 140 display, or release Imminent Threat Alert information from the 141 law enforcement agency having jurisdiction, the Department of 142 Law Enforcement; any state or local law enforcement agency and 143 the personnel of such agency; any radio or television network, 144 broadcaster, or other media representative; any dealer of 145 communications services as those terms are defined in s. 202.11; 146 or any agency, employee, individual, or entity is immune from 147 civil liability for damages for complying in good faith with 148 this subsection and is presumed to have acted in good faith in 149 recording, reporting, transmitting, displaying, or releasing 150 information pertaining to an Imminent Threat Alert. The 151 presumption of good faith is not overcome if a technical or 152 clerical error is made by any agency, employee, individual, or 153 entity acting at the request of the local law enforcement agency 154 having jurisdiction, or if information pertaining to an Imminent 155 Threat Alert is incomplete or incorrect because the information 156 received from the local law enforcement agency was incomplete or 157 incorrect. 158 2.âNeither this subsection nor any other law creates a duty 159 of the agency, employee, individual, or entity to record, 160 report, transmit, display, or release the Imminent Threat Alert 161 information received from the local law enforcement agency 162 having jurisdiction. The decision to record, report, transmit, 163 display, or release information is discretionary with the 164 agency, employee, individual, or entity receiving the 165 information. 166 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.